Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,157
Pedestrians soliciting rides or
business; prohibited acts;
ordinance authorizing solicitation of contributions.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(3) of this section, no person shall stand in a roadway for the
purpose of soliciting a ride, employment, contributions, or business from
the occupant of any vehicle.

(2) No person shall stand on or in proximity to a highway for the purposes
of soliciting the watching or guarding of any vehicle while parked or about
to be parked on a highway.

(3)(a) Any municipality
may, by ordinance, allow pedestrians over the age of eighteen to enter one
or more roadways, except roadways that are part of the state highway system,
at specified times and locations and approach vehicles when stopped by traffic
control devices or traffic control signals for the purpose of soliciting contributions
which are to be devoted to charitable or community betterment purposes.

(b) Any ordinance enacted
pursuant to this subsection shall be a general ordinance which shall not exclude
or give preference to any individual or the members of any organization, association,
or group. Any ordinance whose terms or provisions do not strictly comply with
this subsection is void.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 47;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-647;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 253;

Laws 2009, LB278, § 1.